Final source/morphy/foma/sinhala.foma
# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define I1Grammar 	LexiconI1 .o.
		CIRule1		.o.
		CIRule2		.o.
              #	CIRule3		.o.
		CIRule4		.o.
		Cleanup;

read lexc J1.lexc
define LexiconJ1;


define BJ1 [ ා ප න ් | ා ප ල ් ල ා | ා | ෑ |​ෑ ව ෙ ම ි |​ෑ ව ෙ ම ු |ෑ ව ෙ හ ි |ෑ ව ෙ හ ු |ෑ ව ා ය | ෑ ව ේ ය |ෑ ව ෝ​ ය |ෑ ව ෝ​ ත් | ෑ ව ේ];

define CJ1 [ව ු ණ ු | ව ේ |ව ෙ ම ි |ව ෙ ම ු |ව ෙ හ ි |ව ෙ හ ු |ව ෙ ය ි|ව ෙ ත ි | ව ි ය];




######### Rewrite rules

define CJRule1  ා -> 0 || _ "^" BJ1  ;
define CJRule2  [..] -> ැ || A _ "^" CJ1 ;
define CJRule3  ා -> ෑ || _ "^" CJ1 ;

# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define J1Grammar 	LexiconJ1 .o.
		CJRule1		.o.
		CJRule2		.o.
              	CJRule3		.o.
		Cleanup;



define Bk1 [ ු ණ ු | ු න ෙ ම ි | ු න ෙ ම ු | ු න ෙ හ ි | ු න ෙ හ ු | ු න ේ ය | ු න ා ය | ු න ෝ ය | ි ය න ් | ි ය ල ් ල ා | ී | ි ය | ු න ො ත ් | ු න ේ | ී ම ට | ූ ];
 


read lexc k1.lexc
define Lexiconk1;

######### Rewrite rules

###
define WeAClass          ෙ -> 0 || _ "^" Bk1 ;




# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define Classk1Grammar 	Lexiconk1                .o.
                        WeAClass               .o.
               	        Cleanup;


define BL [හ ි න ් | ය ෙ ම ි |ය ෙ ම ු |ය ෙ හ ි | ය ෙ හ ු | ය ා ය |ය ේ ය|ය ෝ ය | ය ො ත ් ];


read lexc L.lexc
define LexiconL;

######### Rewrite rules

define CLRule1        [ය]  -> ග ි || .#. _   "^" BL ;

# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define ClassLGrammar 	LexiconL            .o.
                        CLRule1          .o.
               	        Cleanup;


define Bm1 [ ී ප න ් | ී ප ල ් ල ා | ී | ු න ් න ු | ු න ් න ෙ ම ි | ු න ් න ෙ ම ු | ු න ් න ෙ හ ි | ු න ් න ෙ හ ු | ු න ් න ේ ය | ු න ් න ා ය | ු න ් න ෝ ය | ි ය | ු න ් න හ ො ත ් | ු න ් න ේ ];



read lexc m1.lexc
define Lexiconm1;

######### Rewrite rules

define DeAClass           ෙ -> 0 || A _  "^" Bm1 ;



# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define Classm1Grammar 	Lexiconm1               .o.
                        DeAClass              .o.
               	        Cleanup;



read lexc N.lexc
define LexiconN;



define BN [ ව ු |ව ් ව ෙ ම ි | ව ු ව ෙ ම ු  |​ ව ් ව ා ය |​ව ් ව ෝ ය |  ව ් ව ේ |  ව ් ව ො ත ් |​ ව ් ව ෝ ය | ​ ව ් ව ේ ය | ​ ව ් ව ෙ ​ හ ු | ​ ව ් ව ෙ ​ හ ි]; 
define DN [ී | ී ​ප න ් |  ී ප ල ් ල ා | ි ය ];





######### Rewrite rules

define PClass1 ො -> ි ||  _  "^" BN ;
define PClass2 ො -> 0 ||  _  "^" DN ;




# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define ClassFifGrammar 	LexiconN            .o.
                        PClass1          .o.
                        PClass2          .o.
               	        Cleanup;


define Bo1 [ ු ණ ු | ූ | ු ව ෙ ම ි | ු ව ෙ ම ු | ු ව ෙ හ ි | ු ව ෙ හ ු | ු ව ා ය | ු ව ේ ය | ු ව ෝ ය | ව ේ | ෙ ම ි | ෙ ම ු | ෙ ය ි | ෙ හ ු | ෙ ත ි | ෙ හ ි | ව ෙ ය ි | ව ෙ ත ි | ේ | ි ය | ු ව ො ත ් | ු ව ේ ];



read lexc o1.lexc
define Lexicono1;

######### Rewrite rules

define KaraClass        [..]  -> ෙ || A _ A  "^" Bo1 ;


# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define Classo1Grammar 	Lexicono1            .o.
                        KaraClass          .o.
               	        Cleanup;


read lexc Q.lexc
define LexiconQ;



define BQ [ ප න ් | ප ල ් ල ා | ි ම ි | ි ම ි ව ා | ි ම ු | ි ම ු ව ා | ි ය ි | ි ව ු | ග ෙ න |  ි ද ් ද ී | ි ත ි | ි ත ් ව ා]; 






######### Rewrite rules

define PQClass1 න ් -> ඳ ||  _  "^" BQ ;





# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define ClassQGrammar 	LexiconQ            .o.
                        PQClass1          .o.
               	        Cleanup;




regex [ClassOneGrammar|LexiconB|ClassTwoGrammar|LexiconD|LexiconE|LexiconF|LexiconG|LexiconH|LexiconI|LexiconJ|LexiconK|LexiconL|LexiconM|ClassThreeGrammar|ClassFourGrammar|ClassFiveGrammar|LexiconN|LexiconX|LexiconY|ClassSixGrammar|ClassSevenGrammar|ClassEightGrammar|ClassNineGrammar|ClassTenGrammar|LexiconAA|LexiconAB|LexiconAC|LexiconAD|LexiconAE|LexiconAF|LexiconAG|LexiconAH|LexiconAI|LexiconAJ|LexiconAK|LexiconAL|LexiconAM|ClassTenGrammar|ClassElevenGrammar|Classa1Grammar | Classa2Grammar | Classa3Grammar | Classa4Grammar | Classa5Grammar | Classa6Grammar | B1Grammar | C1Grammar | C2Grammar | C3Grammar | D1Grammar | D2Grammar | D3Grammar | D4Grammar | D5Grammar | E1Grammar | ClassE1Grammar | ClassF2Grammar | ClassF3Grammar | Classg1Grammar | Classg2Grammar | Classg3Grammar | Classg4Grammar | ClassHGrammar | I1Grammar | J1Grammar | Classk1Grammar |  ClassLGrammar | Classm1Grammar | ClassFifGrammar | Classo1Grammar | ClassQGrammar];
